Hawaii statutes.
[§431:31-106] Termination or modification
of portable electronics insurance. (a) An insurer may terminate or
otherwise change the terms and conditions of a policy of portable electronics
insurance. The vendor and enrolled customers shall be provided at least sixty
days' notice before the change becomes effective.

(b) If the insurer changes the terms and
conditions of a policy of portable electronics insurance, the insurer shall provide
the vendor with a revised policy or endorsement and each enrolled customer with
a revised certificate, endorsement, updated brochure, or other evidence
indicating that a change in the terms and conditions has occurred, and a
summary of material changes.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an insurer
may terminate an enrolled customer's enrollment under a policy of portable
electronics insurance upon fifteen days' notice for discovery of fraud or
material misrepresentation in obtaining coverage or in the presentation of a
claim thereunder.

(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an insurer
may immediately terminate an enrolled customer's enrollment under a policy of
portable electronics insurance:

(1) For nonpayment of an insurance policy premium;

(2) If the enrolled customer ceases to have an active
service with the vendor; or

(3) If an enrolled customer exhausts the aggregate
limit of liability, if any, under the terms of the policy of portable
electronics insurance and the insurer sends notice of termination to the enrolled
customer within thirty calendar days after exhaustion of the limit; provided
that, if notice is not timely sent, enrollment shall continue notwithstanding
the aggregate limit of liability, until the insurer sends notice of termination
to the enrolled customer.

(e) If a policy of portable electronics
insurance is terminated by a vendor, the vendor shall mail or deliver written
notice to the enrolled customer informing the enrolled customer of the
termination of the policy and the effective date of termination. The written
notice shall be mailed or delivered to the enrolled customer at least thirty days
prior to the termination.

(f) Whenever notice or correspondence with
respect to a policy of portable electronics insurance is required pursuant to
this section, or is otherwise required by law, the notice or correspondence
shall be in writing and sent within the notice period, if any, specified within
the law requiring the notice or correspondence. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, notice and correspondence may be sent either by mail or by electronic
means as set forth in this subsection. If the notice or correspondence is
mailed, it shall be sent to the vendor at the vendor's mailing address
specified for such purpose and to its affected enrolled customers' last known
mailing addresses on file with the insurer. The insurer or vendor, as
applicable, shall maintain proof of mailing in a form authorized or accepted by
the United States Postal Service or other commercial mail delivery service. If
the notice or correspondence is sent by electronic means, it shall be sent to
the vendor at the vendor's electronic-mail address specified for such purpose
and to its affected enrolled customers' last known electronic-mail addresses as
provided by each enrolled customer to the insurer or vendor, as applicable.

For purposes of this subsection, an enrolled
customer's provision of an electronic-mail address to the insurer or vendor, as
applicable, shall be deemed consent to receive notices and correspondence by
electronic means. The insurer or vendor, as applicable, shall maintain proof
that the notice or correspondence was sent.

(g) Notice or correspondence required by this
section or otherwise required by law may be sent on behalf of an insurer or
vendor, as applicable, by the supervising entity appointed by the insurer. [L
2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next